New Jersey, session 221, S1452.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A person is guilty of the crime of committing an act of domestic violence in the presence of a child if the person commits an act of domestic violence defined in subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19) in the presence of a child to whom the actor or the victim is a parent, guardian, or resource family parent knowing that the child was present during the commission of the act. b.    As used in this section: Child means a person who is 16 years of age or younger. In the presence of a child means in the physical presence of a child or having knowledge that a child is present and may see or hear an act of domestic violence. c.     The crime of committing an act of domestic violence in the presence of a child is a crime of the fourth degree if the underlying offense is a disorderly persons offense or petty disorderly persons offense.  Otherwise, the crime of committing an act of domestic violence in the presence of a child is a crime one degree higher than the most serious underlying offense. d.    Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.2C:1-8 or any other provision of law, a conviction for the crime of committing an act of domestic violence in the presence of a child shall not merge with a conviction for any underlying offense, nor shall any conviction for such underlying offense merge with a conviction for the crime of committing an act of domestic violence in the presence of a child.  The court shall impose separate sentences upon a conviction for the crime of committing an act of domestic violence in the presence of a child and a conviction for any underlying offense. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.